Utah statutes.
17B-1-511.   Continuation of tax levy after withdrawal to pay for proportionate share of district bonds.

(1)  Other than as provided in Subsection (2), and unless an escrow trust fund is established and funded pursuant to Subsection 17B-1-510(5)(j), property within the withdrawn area shall continue after withdrawal to be subject to a tax by the local district:

(a)  for the purpose of paying the withdrawn area's just proportion of the local district's general obligation bonds, other than those bonds treated as revenue bonds under Subsection 17B-1-510(5)(i), until the bonded indebtedness has been satisfied; and

(b)  to the extent and for the years necessary to generate sufficient revenue that, when combined with the revenues from the district remaining after withdrawal, is sufficient to provide for the payment of principal and interest on the district's general obligation bonds that are treated as revenue bonds under Subsection 17B-1-510(5)(i).

(2)  For a local district funded predominately by revenues other than property taxes, service charges, or assessments based upon an allotment of acre-feet of water, taxes within the withdrawn area shall continue to be collected for purposes of paying the withdrawn area's proportionate share of bonded indebtedness or judgments against the local district incurred prior to the date the petition was filed.

(3)  Except as provided in Subsections (1) and (2), upon withdrawal, the withdrawing area is relieved of all other taxes, assessments, and charges levied by the district, including taxes and charges for the payment of revenue bonds and maintenance and operation cost of the local district.

